Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Definitions and Notice

48-11-201. Definitions for chapters 11 through 27.

As used in chapters 11-27 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires (or the term is otherwise defined in another chapter of the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, in which event the term shall have such other meaning for that chapter):

“Affiliate” of a specific person means a person that directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the person specified;

“Authorized shares” means the shares of all classes a domestic or foreign corporation is authorized to issue;

“Business” means any activity or function;

“Charter” includes amended and restated charters and articles of merger;

“Confirmation of good standing” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that at the time such confirmation is issued a domestic or foreign corporation is current on all taxes and penalties to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

“Conspicuous” means so written that a reasonable person against whom the writing is to operate should have noticed it. For example, printing in italics or boldface or contrasting color, or typing in capitals or underlined, is conspicuous;

“Corporation,” “domestic corporation” or “domestic business corporation” means a corporation for profit, which is not a foreign corporation, incorporated under or subject to chapters 11-27 of this title;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and, if authorized in accordance with § 48-11-202, by electronic transmission;

“Distribution” means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property (except its own shares) or incurrence of indebtedness (whether directly or indirectly, including through a guaranty) by a corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect of any of its shares. A distribution may be in the form of a declaration or payment of a dividend; a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of shares; a distribution of indebtedness (which includes the incurrence of indebtedness for the benefit of the shareholders); or otherwise;

“Document” means:

Any tangible medium on which information is inscribed, and includes any writing or written instrument; or

An electronic record;

“Effective date of notice,” as defined in § 48-11-202(i);

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities;

“Electronic record” means information that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in paper form through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with § 48-11-202;

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any form or process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper or another tangible medium, which is:

Suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient; and

Is retrievable in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice, unless otherwise authorized in accordance with § 48-11-202(j);

“Emergency” exists when a quorum of the corporate directors cannot readily be assembled because of some catastrophic event;

“Employee” includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director also an employee;

“Entity” includes domestic and foreign business corporation; domestic and foreign nonprofit corporation; estate; trust; domestic and foreign unincorporated entity and state, United States, and foreign government. The term includes two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest;

“Filing entity” means an unincorporated entity that is of a type that is created by filing a public organic document;

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation for profit incorporated under a law other than the laws of this state;

“Foreign nonprofit corporation” means a corporation incorporated under a law other than the law of this state, which would be a nonprofit corporation if incorporated under the laws of this state;

“Foreign unincorporated entity” means an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by an organic law of a jurisdiction other than this state;

“Governmental subdivision” includes authority, county, district, and municipality;

“Includes” denotes a partial definition;

“Individual” includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased individual;

“Interest” means either or both of the following rights under the organic law of an unincorporated entity:

The right to receive distributions from the entity either in the ordinary course or upon liquidation; or

The right to receive notice or vote on issues involving its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, or person responsible for managing its business and affairs;

“Means” denotes an exhaustive definition;

“Month” means the time from any day of any month to the corresponding day of the succeeding month, if any, and if none, the last day of the succeeding month. “A period of two (2) or more months” means the time from any day of the first month in such period to the corresponding day of the last month in such period, if any, and if none, the last day of the last month in such period;

“Nonfiling entity” means an unincorporated entity that is of a type that is not created by filing a public organic document;

“Nonprofit corporation” or “domestic nonprofit corporation” means a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state and subject to the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in chapters 51-68 of this title;

“Notice,” as defined in § 48-11-202;

“Organic document” means a public organic document or a private organic document;

“Organic law” means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation or unincorporated entity;

“Person” includes individual and entity;

“Principal office” means the office (in or out of this state) so designated in the annual report where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located;

“Private organic document” means any document (other than the public organic document, if any) that determines the internal governance of an unincorporated entity. Where a private organic document has been amended or restated, the term means the private organic document as last amended or restated;

“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative, and investigatory action;

“Public organic document” means the document, if any, that is filed of public record to create an unincorporated entity. Where a public organic document has been amended or restated, the term means the public organic document as last amended or restated;

“Record date” means the date established under chapter 16 or 17 on which a corporation determines the identity of its shareholders for purposes of chapters 11-27 of this title;

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the bylaws or the board of directors has delegated responsibility under § 48-18-401(c) for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and of the shareholders and for authenticating records of the corporation;

“Share” means the unit into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided;

“Shareholder” means the person in whose name shares are registered in the records of a corporation or the beneficial owner of shares to the extent of the rights granted by a nominee certificate on file with a corporation;

“Sign” or “signature” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a document:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol to a document, and includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed signature; or

To attach to or logically associate with an electronic transmission an electronic sound, symbol, or process, and includes an electronic signature in an electronic transmission;

“State,” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) and a territory and insular possession (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) of the United States;

“Subscriber” means a person who subscribes for shares in a corporation, whether before or after incorporation;

“Subsidiary” means a corporation more than fifty percent (50%) of whose outstanding voting shares are owned by its parent and/or the parent's other wholly-owned subsidiaries;

“Tax clearance for termination or withdrawal” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that a domestic or foreign corporation has filed all applicable reports, including, but not limited to, a final report, and has paid all fees, penalties and taxes as required by the revenue laws of this state;

“Unincorporated entity” means an organization or artificial legal person that either has a separate legal existence or has the power to acquire an estate in real property in its own name and that is not any of the following: a domestic or foreign business or nonprofit corporation, an estate, a trust, a state, the United States, or a foreign government. The term includes a general partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, joint stock association, and unincorporated nonprofit association;

“United States” includes district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States;

“Voting group” means all shares of one (1) or more classes or series that under the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the charter or chapters 11-27 of this title to vote generally on the matter are for that purpose a single voting group; and

“Writing” or “written” means any information in the form of a document.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.20; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 3, 4; 1989, ch. 451, § 1; 1994, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 741, § 1; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 1-6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1114.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores in Drafting Shareholder Agreements (Robert L. McMurray), 23 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

48-11-202. General notice requirements.

Notice under chapters 11-27 of this title must be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable in the circumstances and not prohibited by the charter or bylaws. Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, words in a notice or other communication under chapters 11-27 of this title must be in English.

A notice or other communication may be given or sent by any method of delivery, except that electronic transmissions must be in accordance with this section. If these methods of delivery are impracticable, a notice or other communication may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published, or by radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication.

Notice or other communication to a domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this state) may be delivered to its registered agent at its registered office (or to a designated mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered agent's registered office) or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent annual report (or to a designated mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the corporation's principal office) or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered an annual report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

Notice or other communications may be delivered by electronic transmission if consented to by the recipient or if authorized by subsection (j).

Any consent under subsection (d) may be revoked by the person who consented by written or electronic notice to the person to whom the consent was delivered. Any such consent is deemed revoked if:

The corporation is unable to deliver two (2) consecutive electronic transmissions given by the corporation in accordance with such consent; and

Such inability becomes known to the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation or to the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of notice or other communication.

The inadvertent failure to treat such inability as a revocation shall not invalidate any meeting or other action.

Unless otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic transmission is received when:

It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purposes of receiving electronic transmissions or information of the type sent, and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic transmission; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgement from an information processing system described in subdivision (f)(1) establishes that an electronic transmission was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

An electronic transmission is received under this section even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

Notice or other communication, if in a comprehensible form or manner, is effective at the earliest of the following:

If in a physical form, the earliest of when it is actually received, or when it is left at:

A shareholder's address shown on the corporation's record of shareholders maintained by the corporation under § 48-26-101(c);

A director's residence or usual place of business; or

The corporation's principal place of business;

If mailed first class postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a shareholder, upon deposit in the United States mail;

If mailed by United States mail postage prepaid and correctly addressed to a recipient other than a shareholder, the earliest of when it is actually received, or:

If sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, the date shown on the return receipt signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Five (5) days after it is deposited in the United States mail;

If an electronic transmission, when it is received as provided in subsection (f); or

If oral, when communicated, if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

A notice or other communication may be in the form of an electronic transmission that cannot be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process used in conventional commercial practice only if:

The electronic transmission is otherwise retrievable in perceivable form; and

The sender and the recipient have consented in writing to the use of such form of electronic transmission.

If chapters 11-27 of this title prescribe requirements for notices or other communications in particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If the charter or bylaws prescribe requirements for notices or other communications, not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of chapters 11-27 of this title, those requirements govern. The charter or bylaws may authorize or require delivery of notices of meetings of directors by electronic transmission.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.21; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 5, 6; 1994, ch. 776, § 3; 2012, ch. 1051, § 7.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-811, 5-1107, 5-1108, 5-1301.

48-11-203. Number of shareholders.

For purposes of chapters 11-27 of this title, the following identified as a shareholder in a corporation's current record of shareholders constitutes one (1) shareholder:

Three (3) or fewer co-owners;

A corporation, partnership, trust, estate, or other entity; and

The trustees, guardians, custodians, or other fiduciaries of a single trust, estate, or account.

For purposes of chapters 11-27 of this title, shareholdings registered in substantially similar names constitute one (1) shareholder if it is reasonable to believe that the names represent the same person.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 1.22.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1301.